District of Columbia statutes.
9-433.02

Penalty; prosecution.

Any person violating any of the provisions of § 9-433.01 shall on conviction thereof in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia be punished by a fine of not less than $100 nor more than $1,000; and in default of payment of such fine such person shall be confined in the workhouse of the District of Columbia for a period not exceeding 6 months; and all prosecutions shall be in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, in the name of the District of Columbia.

Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 203, 47 DCR 520

History